District of Columbia statutes.
4-517

Duty of law enforcement agencies.

(a)

All law enforcement agencies in the District of Columbia shall inform victims or secondary victims of the existence of the Program and provide application forms to victims and secondary victims.

(b)

No law enforcement agency shall be civilly liable for a failure to comply with subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

The Court shall provide application forms, other documents, and general information that law enforcement agencies may require to comply with this section.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 18, 44 DCR 1142
See note to § 4-501.
1981 Ed., § 3-437.
This section is referenced in § 4-505.